Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,125
Improvement district; materials to be used; designate by petition.

A city shall give the property owners within any improvement district the opportunity to designate, by petition to be filed with the city, the specified material which such property owners desire to be used in the improvement of the street or alley or other grounds within such improvement district.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 42, p. 210;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 129.